Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1261
Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from a final order in a proceeding under sections 43-1248 to 43-1264 in accordance with expedited appellate procedures in other civil cases. Unless the court enters a temporary emergency order under section 43-1241, the enforcing court may not stay an order enforcing a child custody determination pending appeal.

Laws 2003, LB 148, § 36.